Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-868
Bridge commission; creation; general powers.

Through the exercise of the powers conferred by sections 39-855 to 39-872, the governing body of any county, city, or village may by resolution create a bridge commission. Upon the passage of such resolution, the governing body of such county shall appoint three, four, or five persons who shall constitute the bridge commission of such county. The bridge commission shall be a public body corporate and politic and a political subdivision of the State of Nebraska. The bridge commission shall have the power to contract, to sue and be sued, and to adopt a seal and alter the same at pleasure, but shall not have power to pledge the credit or taxing power of the county.

Laws 1941, c. 78, § 2, p. 318;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-2107;

R.S.1943, § 39-868;

Laws 1986, LB 640, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 607, § 2.